fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-miskotâkay_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miskotâkay - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, coat/dress	AEW C-initial NDI2
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: miskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: niskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kiskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: niskotâkânân
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kiskotâkânaw
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kiskotâkâwâw
     
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: oskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: oskotâkâwâw
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: oskotâkâyiw

     miskotâkay+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: miskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: niskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kiskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: niskotâkânâna
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kiskotâkânawa
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kiskotâkâwâwa
     
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: oskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: oskotâkâwâwa
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: oskotâkâyiwa

     miskotâkay+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: miskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: niskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kiskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: niskotâkânâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kiskotâkânâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kiskotâkâwâhk

     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: oskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: oskotâkâwâhk
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: oskotâkâyihk

     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Sg:      [miskocâkâs,     miskocâkâsis]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [niskocâkâs,     niskocâkâsis]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kiskocâkâs,     kiskocâkâsis]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [niskocâkâsinân, niskocâkâsisinân]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kiskocâkâsinaw, kiskocâkâsisinaw]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kiskocâkâsiwâw, kiskocâkâsisiwâw]

     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [oskocâkâs,     oskocâkâsis]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [oskocâkâsiwâw, oskocâkâsisiwâw]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [oskocâkâsiyiw, oskocâkâsisiyiw]

     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Pl:      [miskocâkâsa,     miskocâkâsisa]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [niskocâkâsa,     niskocâkâsisa]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kiskocâkâsa,     kiskocâkâsisa]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [niskocâkâsinâna, niskocâkâsisinâna]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kiskocâkâsinawa, kiskocâkâsisinawa]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kiskocâkâsiwâwa, kiskocâkâsisiwâwa]
     
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [oskocâkâsa,      oskocâkâsisa]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [oskocâkâsiwâwa,  oskocâkâsisiwâwa]
     miskotâkay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [oskocâkâsiyiwa,  oskocâkâsisiyiwa]
